West Virginia, session 2025, SB375.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. State Auditor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 13, 2024, authorized under the authority of §31I-1-13 of this code, modified by the State Auditor to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 17, 2024, relating to the State Auditor (private trust companies, 155 CSR 12), is authorized.